Colorado, session 2026A, HB1400.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-51-208, amend
(1)(f) as follows:
24-51-208. Allocation of money.
(1) The money of the association shall be divided into several trust
funds, including, but not limited to:
(f) The health care trust fund, created pursuant to the provisions of
section 24-51-1201 (1), which consists of a portion of the employer
contributions equal to one and two FIFTY-TWO one-hundredths OF ONE
percent of member salaries; a portion of the amount paid by members to
purchase service credit relating to noncovered employment as determined
pursuant to section 24-51-505 (7); thirty percent of the amount of any
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

reduction in the employer contribution rates as determined in section
24-51-408.5 (5) to amortize any overfunding in each division's trust fund;
deductions of premium amounts from monthly benefits of participating
benefit recipients; premiums paid directly to the trust fund by participating
benefit recipients, members, and dependents; monthly payments made by
employers on behalf of participating benefit recipients, members, and
dependents; and interest; in addition to a proportional share of investment
income earned thereon;
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-51-414, amend (4)
as follows:
24-51-414. Direct distribution - definitions.
(4) (a) Prior to July 1, 2030 JULY 1, 2026, the association shall
allocate the direct distribution to the trust funds of each division of the
association as it would an employer contribution, in a manner that is
proportionate to the annual payroll of each division as reported to the
association; except that the association shall not allocate any portion of the
direct distribution amount to the local government division or the Denver
public schools division of the association.
(b) (I) Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (4) to the
contrary, on or after July 1, 2025, if the allocation methodology described
in this subsection (4) would result in the blended total contribution amount
equaling less than ninety-eight percent of the blended total required
contribution the association may instead allocate the direct distribution to
the trust funds of each division of the association in an actuarial manner as
necessary to achieve at least ninety-eight percent of the blended total
required contribution; except that the association shall not allocate any
portion of the direct distribution amount to the local government division
of the association.
(II) As used in this subsection (4)(b) SUBSECTION (4), unless the
context otherwise requires:
(A) "Blended total contribution amount" has the same meaning as
in section 24-51-413 (1)(a).
(B) "Blended total required contribution" has the same meaning as
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1400

in section 24-51-413 (1)(b).
(C) "Fulfillment year" has the same meaning as set forth in
subsection (8.5)(d)(III) of this section.
(c) Beginning July 1, 2030 WITH THE DIRECT DISTRIBUTION
OCCURRING ON JULY 1, 2026, AND ON JULY 1 OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER,
the association shall allocate the direct distribution to the trust funds of each
division of the association as it would an employer contribution, in a
manner that is proportionate to the annual payroll of each division as
reported to the association; except that ON AN ACTUARIAL BASIS TO
MAXIMIZE THE BLENDED TOTAL CONTRIBUTION AMOUNT IN A MANNER THAT
LIMITS, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, ADJUSTMENTS REQUIRED BY SECTION
24-51-413 (3). BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, AND ON JULY 1 OF EACH YEAR
PRECEDING 2030, the association shall not allocate any portion of the direct
distribution amount to the local government division OR THE DENVER
PUBLIC SCHOOLS DIVISION OF THE ASSOCIATION. BEGINNING JULY 1, 2030,
AND ON JULY 1 OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE ASSOCIATION SHALL NOT
ALLOCATE ANY PORTION OF THE DIRECT DISTRIBUTION AMOUNT TO THE
LOCAL GOVERNMENT DIVISION OF THE ASSOCIATION.
SECTION 3. Effective date. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1400

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1400